Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4605.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 17. (1) An assignment of, or order for payment of, salary, wages, commissions, or other compensation for services, earned or to be earned, given to secure a loan made by a licensee under this act, shall is not be valid. A chattel mortgage or other lien on household goods then in the possession and use of the a borrower shall is not be valid unless it is in writing and signed in person by the borrower. (2) If the a borrower is married, a chattel mortgage or other lien on household goods shall is not be valid unless it is signed in person by both husband and wife. spouses. The written assent of a spouse under this section shall is not be required when husband and wife the spouses have been living separate and apart for a period of not less than 5 months before the making of the chattel mortgage or other lien. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Joint Resolution ____ (request no. S00781'25) or House Joint Resolution F (request no. H00781'25) of the 103rd Legislature becomes a part of the state constitution of 1963 as provided in section 1 of article XII of the state constitution of 1963.